Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 10

Liability of Trustees and Rights of Persons Dealing with Trustee

35-15-1001. Remedies for breach of trust.

A violation by a trustee of a duty the trustee owes to a beneficiary is a breach of trust.

To remedy a breach of trust that has occurred or may occur, the court may:

Compel the trustee to perform the trustee's duties;

Enjoin the trustee from committing a breach of trust;

Compel the trustee to redress a breach of trust by paying money, restoring property, or other means;

Order a trustee to account;

Appoint a special fiduciary to take possession of the trust property and administer the trust;

Suspend the trustee;

Remove the trustee as provided in § 35-15-706;

Reduce or deny compensation to the trustee;

Subject to § 35-15-1012, void an act of the trustee, impose a lien or a constructive trust on trust property, or trace trust property wrongfully disposed of and recover the property or its proceeds; or

Order any other appropriate relief whether provided elsewhere in this chapter, available at common law or under equity principles.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 77.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 17.

35-15-1002. Damages for breach of trust.

Except as otherwise provided in § 35-3-117(a)-(d) with regard to investment of trust funds or elsewhere in this chapter, a trustee who commits a breach of trust is liable to the beneficiaries affected for the greater of:

The amount required to restore the value of the trust property and trust distributions to what they would have been had the breach not occurred; or

The profit the trustee made by reason of the breach.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (b), if more than one (1) trustee is liable to the beneficiaries for a breach of trust, a trustee is entitled to contribution from the other trustee or trustees. A trustee is not entitled to contribution if the trustee was substantially more at fault than another trustee or if the trustee committed the breach of trust in bad faith or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the trust or the interests of the beneficiaries. A trustee who received a benefit from the breach of trust is not entitled to contribution from another trustee to the extent of the benefit received.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 78.

35-15-1003. Damages in absence of breach.

Absent a breach of trust, a trustee is not liable to a beneficiary for a loss or depreciation in the value of trust property or for not having made a profit.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 79.

35-15-1004. Attorney's fees and costs.

In a judicial proceeding involving the administration of a trust, the court, as justice and equity may require, may award costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, to any party, to be paid by another party or from the trust that is the subject of the controversy.

In a nonjudicial proceeding involving the administration of a trust, the trustee may pay fees, other reasonable costs and expenses from the trust assets where all of the parties to the proceeding agree in writing.

In a mediation or arbitration proceeding involving the administration of a trust, the mediator or arbitrator may award fees, other reasonable costs and expenses against the assets of the trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 80.

35-15-1005. Limitation of action for breach of trust against trustee, former trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector.

A beneficiary, trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector shall not commence a proceeding against a trustee, former trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector for breach of trust more than one (1) year after the earlier of:

The date the beneficiary, trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector or a representative of the beneficiary, trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector was sent information that adequately disclosed facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust; or

The date the beneficiary, trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector or a representative of the beneficiary, trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector possessed actual knowledge of facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust.

For purposes of this section, facts indicate the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if the facts provide sufficient information to enable the beneficiary; trustee; trust advisor; trust protector; or the representative of the beneficiary, trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector to have actual knowledge of the potential claim, or have sufficient information to be presumed to know of the potential claim or to know that an additional inquiry is necessary to determine whether there is a potential claim.

If subsection (a) does not apply, a judicial proceeding against a trustee, former trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector for breach of trust must be commenced within three (3) years after the first to occur of:

The removal, resignation, or death of the trustee, former trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector;

The termination of the beneficiary's interest in the trust; or

The termination of the trust.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(c), no trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector may commence a proceeding against a trustee or a former trustee if, under subsection (a), (b), or (c), none of the beneficiaries would be entitled to commence a proceeding against a trustee or a former trustee for a breach of trust.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)–(c), no beneficiary, trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector may commence a proceeding against a trustee or former trustee for any matter covered by a final accounting approved by the court under § 35-15-205.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 81; 2013, ch. 390, § 40; 2017, ch. 290, § 14; 2019, ch. 340, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) A beneficiary may not commence a proceeding against a trustee for breach of trust more than one (1) year after the date the beneficiary or a representative of the beneficiary was sent a report that adequately disclosed facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust.“(b) A report adequately discloses facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the beneficiary or the beneficiary's representative knows of the potential claim or has sufficient information to be presumed to know of it, or to be put on notice to inquire into its existence.“(c) If subsection (a) does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a beneficiary against a trustee for breach of trust must be commenced within three (3) years after the first to occur of:“(1) The removal, resignation, or death of the trustee;“(2) The termination of the beneficiary's interest in the trust; or“(3) The termination of the trust.“(d) A trustee may not commence a proceeding against a cotrustee or a former trustee for breach of trust more than one (1) year after the date the trustee or a representative of the trustee was sent a report that adequately disclosed facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust.“(e) A report adequately discloses facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the trustee or the trustee's representative knows of the potential claim or has sufficient information to be presumed to know of it, or to be put on notice to inquire into its existence.“(f) If subsection (d) does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a trustee against a cotrustee or former trustee for breach of trust must be commenced within three (3) years after the first to occur of:“(1) The removal, resignation, or death of the cotrustee or a former trustee;“(2) The termination of the beneficiary's interest in the trust; or“(3) The termination of the trust.“(g) A trust advisor or trust protector may not commence a proceeding against a trustee or a former trustee for breach of trust more than one (1) year after the date the trust advisor or trust protector or the respective representative of each was sent a report that adequately disclosed facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust.“(h) A report adequately discloses facts indicating the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the trust advisor or trust protector or the respective representative of each knows of the potential claim or has sufficient information to be presumed to know of it, or to be put on notice to inquire into its existence.“(i) If subsection (g) does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a trust advisor or trust protector against a trustee or former trustee for breach of trust must be commenced within three (3) years after the first to occur of:“(1) The removal, resignation, or death of the trustee or a former trustee;“(2) The termination of the beneficiary's interest in the trust; or“(3) The termination of the trust.“(j) Notwithstanding subsections (d)-(i), no trustee, trust advisor or trust protector, may commence a proceeding against a trustee or a former trustee if, under § 35-15-1005(a)-(c), none of the beneficiaries may commence a proceeding against the cotrustee or former trustee for such breach of trust.”

The 2019 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 1, 2017.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

Acts 2019, ch. 340, § 20. May 10, 2019.

35-15-1006. Reliance on trust instrustment.

A trustee who acts in reasonable reliance on the terms of the trust as expressed in the trust instrument is not liable to a beneficiary for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 82.

35-15-1007. Event affecting administration or distribution.

If the happening of an event, including marriage, divorce, performance of educational requirements, or death, affects the administration or distribution of a trust, a trustee who has exercised reasonable care to ascertain the happening of the event is not liable for a loss resulting from the trustee's lack of knowledge.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 83.

35-15-1008. Exculpation of trustee.

A provision of a trust relieving a trustee of liability for breach of trust is unenforceable to the extent that it:

Relieves the trustee of liability for breach of trust committed in bad faith or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the trust or the interests of the beneficiaries; or

Was inserted as the result of an abuse by the trustee of a fiduciary or confidential relationship to the settlor.

An exculpatory term drafted or caused to be drafted by the trustee is invalid as an abuse of a fiduciary or confidential relationship unless the trustee proves that the exculpatory term is fair under the circumstances and that its existence and contents were adequately communicated to the settlor.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 84.

35-15-1009. Beneficiary's consent, release, or ratification.

A trustee is not liable to a beneficiary for breach of trust if the beneficiary consented in writing to the conduct or transaction constituting the breach, released the trustee from liability for the breach, or ratified the transaction constituting the breach, unless:

The consent, release, or ratification of the beneficiary was induced by improper conduct of the trustee; or

At the time of the consent, release, or ratification, the beneficiary did not know of the beneficiary's rights or of the material facts relating to the breach.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 85.

35-15-1010. Limitation on personal liability of trustee.

Except as otherwise provided in the contract, a trustee is not personally liable on a contract properly entered into in the trustee's fiduciary capacity in the course of administering the trust if the trustee in the contract disclosed the fiduciary capacity.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a) or (c), the debts, obligations and liabilities incurred by a trustee by reason of the ownership, management or control of trust property in the trustee's fiduciary capacity, shall be enforceable solely against the trust and its property, without any obligation or liability personally being borne by any trustee of such trust.

A trustee is personally liable for torts committed in the course of administering a trust only if the trustee is personally at fault on account of the trustee's own willful misconduct proven by clear and convincing evidence.

A claim based on a contract entered into by a trustee in the trustee's fiduciary capacity, on an obligation arising from ownership or control of trust property, or on a tort committed in the course of administering a trust, may be asserted in a judicial proceeding against the trustee in the trustee's fiduciary capacity, whether or not the trustee is personally liable for the claim.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 86; 2010, ch. 725, § 10.

35-15-1011. Interest as general partner.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) or unless personal liability is imposed in the contract, a trustee who holds an interest as a general partner in a general or limited partnership is not personally liable on a contract entered into by the partnership after the trust's acquisition of the interest if the fiduciary capacity was disclosed in the contract or in a statement previously filed pursuant to the Uniform Partnership Act, compiled in title 61, chapter 1, or the Uniform Limited Partnership Act, compiled in title 61, chapter 2.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a trustee who holds an interest as a general partner is not personally liable for torts committed by the partnership or for obligations arising from ownership or control of the interest unless the trustee is personally at fault on account of the trustee's own willful misconduct proven by clear and convincing evidence.

The immunity provided by this section does not apply if an interest in the partnership is held by the trustee in a capacity other than that of trustee.

If the trustee of a revocable trust holds an interest as a general partner, the settlor is personally liable for contracts and other obligations of the partnership as if the settlor were a general partner.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 87; 2010, ch. 725, §§ 11, 12.

35-15-1012. Protection of person dealing with trustee.

A person other than a beneficiary who in “good faith”, as defined in § 47-1-201, assists a trustee, or who in “good faith” and for value deals with a trustee, without knowledge that the trustee is exceeding or improperly exercising the trustee's powers is protected from liability as if the trustee properly exercised the power.

A person other than a beneficiary who in “good faith” deals with a trustee is not required to inquire into the extent of the trustee's powers or the propriety of their exercise.

A person who in “good faith” delivers assets to a trustee need not ensure their proper application.

A person other than a beneficiary who in “good faith” assists a former trustee, or who in “good faith” and for value deals with a former trustee, without knowledge that the trusteeship has terminated is protected from liability as if the former trustee were still a trustee.

Comparable protective provisions of other laws, see §§ 47-8-101 — 47-8-407, relating to commercial transactions or transfer of securities by fiduciaries prevail over the protection provided by this section.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 88.

35-15-1013. Certification of trust.

Instead of furnishing a copy of the trust instrument to any person to evidence the existence and validity of the trust, the trustee may furnish to such person a certification of trust, signed by the trustee or trustees having signatory authority as identified in subdivision (a)(5) and attested by a notary public and shall contain the following:

An affirmation of the current existence of the trust and the date on which the trust came into existence;

The identity of the settlor or settlors, the currently acting trustee or trustees, and the named successor trustee or trustees of the trust or a statement that no successor is named;

The administrative or managerial powers of the trustee, or both;

The revocability or irrevocability of the trust and the identity of any person holding a power to revoke the trust;

When there are multiple trustees or multiple successor trustees, the signature authority of the trustees indicating whether all or less than all of the currently acting trustees are required to sign in order to exercise various powers of the trustee;

Where there are successor trustees designated, a statement detailing the conditions for their succession or a statement that a third party may rely on the authority of one (1) or more successors without proof of their succession;

The trust's identification number, whether a social security or an employer identification number, but only if the trust's identification number is essential to the transaction for which the request for the trust document was made;

The manner in which trust assets should properly be titled; and

A statement that, to the best of the trustee's knowledge, the trust has not been revoked, modified or amended in any manner that would cause the representations contained in the certification of trust to be incorrect.

The certification of trust shall not be required to contain the dispositive provisions of the trust that set forth the distribution of the trust estate.

The trustee offering the certification of trust may provide copies of all or any part of the trust document and amendments, if any. Nothing in this section is intended to require or imply an obligation to provide dispositive provisions of the trust or a copy of the entire trust document and amendments.

A person who acts in reliance on a certification of trust without actual knowledge that the representations contained therein are incorrect is not liable to any person for so acting. A person who does not have actual knowledge that the facts contained in the certification of trust are incorrect may assume without inquiry the existence of the facts contained in the certification of trust. Actual knowledge shall not be inferred solely from the fact that a copy of all or part of the trust instrument is held by the person relying on the trust certification. Nothing contained in this section shall limit the rights of the beneficiaries of the trust against the trustee. Any person relying on the certification of trust shall be indemnified from the assets of the trust to the extent of the share of the trust attributable to the beneficiary or beneficiaries bringing any action against the person for any costs, damage, attorney fees or other expenses incurred in defending any action against the person arising for the transaction to which a certification of trust related.

A person's failure to request a certification of trust does not affect the protections provided that person in this section. No inference that the person has not acted in good faith or that the person was negligent may be drawn from the failure of the person to request a certification of trust. Nothing in this section is intended to create an implication that a person is liable for acting in reliance on a certification of trust under circumstances where the requirements of this section are not satisfied.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a third party, when presented with a trust certificate, to enter into a contract with a trustee relating to trust assets or obligations, or to preclude a third party from demanding as a precondition to any contract that the trustee provide additional information in order to clarify any ambiguities or inconsistencies in the trust certificate.

This section does not limit the right of a person to obtain a copy of the trust instrument in a judicial proceeding concerning the trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 89; 2007, ch. 24, § 32.

35-15-1014. Enforcement of no-contest, in terrorem or forfeiture provisions.

For the purposes of this section, “no-contest provision” includes a “no-contest provision,” “in terrorem provision” or “forfeiture provision” of a trust instrument. A “no-contest provision” means a provision that, if given effect, would reduce or eliminate the interest of any beneficiary of such trust who, directly or indirectly, initiates or otherwise pursues:

Any action to contest the validity of the trust or the terms of the trust;

Any action to set aside or vary the terms of the trust;

Any action to challenge the acts of the trustee or other fiduciary of the trust in the performance of the trustee's or other fiduciary's duties as described in the terms of the trust; or

Any other act or proceedings to frustrate or defeat the settlor's intent as expressed in the terms of the trust.

Regardless of whether or not the beneficiary sought, received or relied upon legal counsel, a no-contest provision shall be enforceable according to the express terms of the no-contest provision without regard to the beneficiary's good or bad faith in taking the action that would justify the complete or partial forfeiture of the beneficiary's interest in the trust under the terms of the no-contest provision unless probable cause exists for the beneficiary taking such action on the grounds of:

Fraud;

Duress;

Revocation;

Lack of testamentary capacity;

Undue influence;

Mistake;

Forgery; or

Irregularity in the execution of the trust instrument.

Subsection (b) shall not apply to:

Any action brought solely to challenge the acts of the trustee or other fiduciary of the trust to the extent that the trustee or other fiduciary has committed a breach of fiduciary duties or breach of trust;

Any action brought by the trustee or any other fiduciary serving under the terms of the trust, unless the trustee or other fiduciary is a beneficiary against whom the no-contest provision is otherwise enforceable;

Any agreement among the beneficiaries and any other interested persons in settlement of a dispute or resolution of any other matter relating to the trust, including without limitation any nonjudicial settlement agreement;

Any action to determine whether a proposed or pending motion, petition, or other proceeding constitutes a contest within the meaning of a no-contest provision;

Any action brought by a beneficiary or on behalf of any such beneficiary for a construction or interpretation of the terms of the trust; or

Any action brought by the attorney general and reporter for a construction or interpretation of a charitable trust or a trust containing a charitable interest if a provision exists in a trust purporting to penalize a charity or charitable interest for contesting the trust if probable cause exists for instituting proceedings.

Pursuant to this section, courts shall enforce the settlor's intent as reflected in a no-contest provision to the greatest extent possible.

Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 41.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Section Comment.

Unless provided otherwise hereinafter, any reference to “section,” “subsection” or “subdivision” means all, or such portion of, T.C.A. § 35-15-1014.

There is no similar section in the Uniform Trust Code. Moreover, the provisions of this section diverge from the restatements. To the extent this section is in conflict with any restatement or any other foreign law, such foreign law is not precedential or controlling and is rejected by the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

This section was included in the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code in furtherance of its overriding policy and goal of carrying out a settlor’s intent, as well as providing settlors with the freedom to dispose of their assets to whom and in the manner they wish, all to the greatest extent constitutionally allowable.

Subsection (a) defines “no-contest provision” and states that such term is synonymous with the terms “in terrorem provision” and “forfeiture provision”.

Subsection (b) states that a no-contest provision is enforceable according to its express terms, without regard to whether a beneficiary is acting in good or bad faith in taking the action triggering the provisions of the no-contest provision unless probable cause exists for such beneficiary taking such action on eight specific grounds. These grounds are basically the same grounds that, if proven true, would cause the trust to be void in general and not just as to the provisions applicable to the beneficiary taking such action.

Subsection (c) contains an explicit list of actions that if taken will not trigger enforceability of the no contest provision. Those actions are:

An action brought solely to redress a breach of duty or of trust;

Any action brought by a fiduciary unless that fiduciary is a beneficiary against whom the no-contest is other-wise enforceable;

Any agreement among the beneficiaries and any other interested persons in settlement of a dispute or in resolution of another matter (other than the no-contest provision), including any nonjudicial settlement agreement; see T.C.A. § 35-15-111 for the matters that can be resolved by, as well as the validity of, a nonjudicial settlement agreement;

Any action taken for the purpose of determining whether a proposed or pending motion, petition or other proceeding qualifies as a contest that will trigger enforcement of the no-contest provision;

Any action by or on behalf of a beneficiary for construction or interpretation of the terms of the trust; and

Any action by the attorney general for construction or interpretation of the terms of a trust containing a charitable interest if a provision exists in the trust that would penalize such charitable interest holder for contesting the trust, but only if probable cause exists for instituting such proceedings.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.